District of Columbia statutes.
29-312.23

Decree of dissolution.

(a)

If, after a hearing, the Superior Court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in § 29-312.20 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Mayor, who shall file it.

(b)

After entering the decree of dissolution, the Superior Court shall direct the winding-up and liquidation of the corporation’s activities and affairs in accordance with § 29-312.05 and the notification of claimants in accordance with §§ 29-312.06 and 29-312.07.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(33), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities” for “business” in (b).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.